Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXVIII Mines and Minerals
Oil and Gas Conservation
353.700.
Administrative review of final determination or order of department — Petition — Notice — Hearing — Report and recommended order of hearing officer — Final order of secretary — Judicial Review.

Any person aggrieved by any final determination made or order issued by the department under this chapter, except any orders of the commission, may file with the Energy and Environment Cabinet’s Office of Administrative Hearings a petition alleging that the determination is contrary to law or fact and is injurious to the petitioner, alleging the grounds and reasons therefor, and demanding a hearing. An order or final determination includes but is not limited to the issuance, denial, modification, or revocation of a permit, but does not include the issuance of a letter identifying deficiencies in an application for a permit, a registration or a certification, or other nonfinal determinations. Unless the cabinet considers that the petition is frivolous, it shall serve written notice of the petition on each person named therein, and shall schedule a hearing before the cabinet not less than twenty-one (21) days after the date of the notice unless the person complained against waives in writing the twenty-one (21) day period.

The right to demand a hearing pursuant to this section shall be limited to a period of thirty (30) days after the petitioner has had actual notice of the final determination or order complained of, or could reasonably have had notice.

The burden of proof shall be upon the party complaining of the order or final determination. Any party may offer into evidence all or any part of the record of the hearing which resulted in the order, and any other relevant evidence.

All hearings under this chapter, except those before the commission, shall be held before a hearing officer, duly qualified to practice law in the Commonwealth of Kentucky, who may be a full-time employee of the cabinet, serve by contract, or be paid on a per diem basis at the discretion of the cabinet. After the conclusion of the hearing, the hearing officer shall, within sixty (60) days, make to the secretary a report and recommended order, which shall contain findings of fact and conclusions of law. If the secretary finds upon written request of the hearing officer that additional time is needed, the secretary may grant an extension. The hearing officer shall serve a copy of the report and recommended order upon all parties of record to the proceeding and their counsels, if any, and they shall be granted the right to file exceptions thereto within fourteen (14) days of receipt. Any party may submit a written response to exceptions within twenty-one (21) days of receipt of the report and recommended order. Exceptions and responses not timely filed shall be noted but shall not be considered by the secretary in making a final order. Within ninety (90) days of the report or recommendation made by the hearing officer, the secretary shall consider the report, exceptions, responses to exceptions, and recommended order and decide the case. The decision shall be served by mail upon all parties and their attorney of record and shall be a final order of the cabinet.

The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations, pursuant to the provisions set forth in this chapter and to the extent possible, consistent with those promulgated pursuant to KRS Chapter 224, establishing formal and informal hearing procedures by which any hearing shall, upon the written request of the operator, permittee, or other person, be held in the Energy and Environment Cabinet’s Office of Administrative Hearings in Frankfort, before an impartial hearing officer who is independent of any prosecutorial functions of the cabinet. The administrative regulations shall provide for the conduct of hearings and investigations of any matter relating to this chapter. The procedures developed pursuant to this subsection shall provide that the hearings be held in the most expeditious manner possible within the time constraints established under this chapter. No person who presided at a prior hearing shall either preside at a subsequent hearing or participate in any further decision or subsequent administrative appeal in the same matter.

Any party aggrieved by a final order of the secretary resulting from a hearing conducted pursuant to this section may appeal to the Franklin Circuit Court within thirty (30) days from the issuance of the final order. The party or parties affected by the final order shall file in the Circuit Court a petition, which states fully the grounds upon which a review is sought and shall assign all errors relied on. The cabinet shall be named respondent, and service shall be had on the secretary. Summons shall issue upon the petition directing the cabinet to send its entire record, properly bound, to the clerk of the Circuit Court after certifying that the record is its entire original record or a true copy. The record, when filed, shall become official and be considered by the Circuit Court on the review. After the case has been properly docketed in the Circuit Court, any party directly affected by the issues on appeal, may, upon notice to the parties, proper showing, and in the discretion of the court, be permitted to intervene. The court shall review the entire record and the findings and final order of the cabinet. No objection to the final order shall be considered by the court, unless the issue was raised before the cabinet or there were reasonable grounds for failure to do so. The findings of the cabinet as to the facts shall be prima facie evidence of the facts found therein. The court shall review the entire record and the findings and final order of the cabinet.

The court may stay the order until the court shall enter its decree. The court shall have jurisdiction to enter a decree affirming or setting aside the order or remanding the cause with directions to modify the order so that it shall conform to the provisions of this chapter. Appeals may be taken by any party to the suit in the same manner and to the same extent as in other civil actions.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 103, § 22; 1974, ch. 45, § 7; 2018 ch. 94, § 11, effective July 14, 2018.

353.710.
Suit to enjoin violation — By department, person adversely affected, Attorney General.

Whenever it appears that any person is violating or threatening to violate any provision of KRS

353.500

to

353.720

, or any rule, regulation or order promulgated or issued under KRS

353.500

to

353.720

, the department may bring suit against the person in the Franklin Circuit Court, or the Circuit Court of the county where the violation occurred or is threatened, or in the county in which the defendant resides or in which any defendant resides if there is more than one (1) defendant, to restrain the person from continuing the violation or from carrying out the threatened violation. In such a suit the court shall have jurisdiction to grant without bond or other undertaking the prohibitory or mandatory injunction as the facts may warrant, including a temporary restraining order or injunction.

If the department shall fail to bring suit to enjoin a violation or threatened violation of any provisions of KRS

353.500

to

353.720

, or any rule, regulation, or order promulgated or issued under KRS

353.500

to

353.720

within ten (10) days after receipt of a written request to do so by any person who is or will be adversely affected by the violation, the person making the request may bring suit in his own behalf to restrain the violation or threatened violation in any court in which the department might have brought suit. The department shall be made a party defendant in the suit in addition to the person allegedly violating or threatening to violate a provision of KRS 353.500 to 353.720, or any rule, regulation or order promulgated or issued under KRS 353.500 to 353.720.

Whenever it appears that any person is violating any provision of KRS

353.500

to

353.720

, or any rule, regulation or order promulgated or issued hereunder, the Attorney General or any person who is adversely affected by the violation may bring suit to restrain the violation in any court in which the department might have brought suit. The department shall be made a party defendant in the suit in addition to the person allegedly violating a provision of or any rule, regulation or order promulgated or issued under KRS

353.500

to

353.720

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 103, § 23, effective June 16, 1960; 2019 ch. 21, § 8, effective June 27, 2019.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Injunction, KRS

454.065

.

353.720.
Construction of KRS 353.500 to 353.720.

KRS

353.500

to

353.720

shall not be construed to authorize any limitation of production of oil or gas from any well, lease, pool, field or property to prevent or control economic waste or to limit production to market demand.

Nothing in KRS

353.500

to

353.720

is intended to or shall be construed as superseding, impairing, abridging or affecting any contractual rights or obligations now or hereafter existing between the respective owners of oil, gas, coal, or other minerals, or any interests therein.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 103, §§ 25, 26, effective June 16, 1960.

353.730.
Investigation of abandoned wells — Application — Report — Bond. [Renumbered]

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 359, § 3, effective July 15, 1998; 2006, ch. 160, § 4, effective July 12, 2006; 2015 ch. 21, § 18, effective June 24, 2015; was renumbered to be §

353.588

, by 2019, ch. 21, § 12, effective June 27, 2019.